Hawaii statutes.
[§46-148] Transitions. Any county
requiring impact fees or imposing development exactions, in order to fund
public facilities, shall incorporate fee requirements into their broader system
of development and land use regulations in such a manner that developments,
either collectively or individually, are not required to pay or otherwise
contribute more than a proportionate share of public facility capital
improvements. Development contributions or payments made under a development
agreement, pursuant to section 46-123, are exempted from this requirement. [L
1992, c 282, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next